test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONGVW_NoExtra_ikwe_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     ikwe: ikwe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1ikwe: niikwe
     +Px2ikwe: giikwe
     +Px3ikwe: oikwe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     ikwe+Dim: ikweens
     ikwe+Con: ikweenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     ikwe+Pos: ikweim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     ikwe+Pej: ikweish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     ikwe+Pos1Pl: ikweinaan
     ikwe+PosPl: ikweiwaa
     ikwe+PosObv: ikweini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     ikwe+Pret: ikweiban
     ikwe+VocPl: ikwe***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     ikwe+Obv: ikwean
     ikwe+Pl: ikweag
     ikwe+Loc: ikweing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1ikwe+Dim: niikweens
     +Px1ikwe+Con: niikweenh
     +Px2ikwe+Dim: giikweens
     +Px2ikwe+Con: giikweenh
     +Px3ikwe+Dim: oikweens
     +Px3ikwe+Con: oikweenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1ikwe+Pos: niikweim
     +Px2ikwe+Pos: giikweim
     +Px3ikwe+Pos: oikweim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1ikwe+Pej: niikweish
     +Px2ikwe+Pej: giikweish
     +Px3ikwe+Pej: oikweish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl: niikweinaan
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl: niikweiwaa
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv: niikweini
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl: giikweinaan
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl: giikweiwaa
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv: giikweini
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl: oikweinaan
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl: oikweiwaa
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv: oikweini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Pret: niikweiban
     +Px1ikwe+VocPl: niikwe***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Pret: giikweiban
     +Px2ikwe+VocPl: giikwe***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Pret: oikweiban
     +Px3ikwe+VocPl: oikwe***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Obv: niikwean
     +Px1ikwe+Pl: niikweag
     +Px1ikwe+Loc: niikweing
     +Px2ikwe+Obv: giikwean
     +Px2ikwe+Pl: giikweag
     +Px2ikwe+Loc: giikweing
     +Px3ikwe+Obv: oikwean
     +Px3ikwe+Pl: oikweag
     +Px3ikwe+Loc: oikweing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     ikwe+Dim+Pos: ikweensim
     ikwe+Con+Pos: ikweenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     ikwe+Dim+Pej: ikweensish
     ikwe+Con+Pej: ikweenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl: ikweensinaan
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl: ikweensiwaa
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv: ikweensini
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl: ikweenhinaan
     ikwe+Con+PosPl: ikweenhiwaa
     ikwe+Con+PosObv: ikweenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     ikwe+Dim+Pret: ikweensiban
     ikwe+Dim+VocPl: ikweens***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pret: ikweenhiban
     ikwe+Con+VocPl: ikweenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Obv: ikweensan
     ikwe+Dim+Pl: ikweensag
     ikwe+Dim+Loc: ikweensing
     ikwe+Con+Obv: ikweenhan
     ikwe+Con+Pl: ikweenhag
     ikwe+Con+Loc: ikweenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     ikwe+Pos+Pej: ikweimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     ikwe+Pos+Pos1Pl: ikweiminaan
     ikwe+Pos+PosPl: ikweimiwaa
     ikwe+Pos+PosObv: ikweimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     ikwe+Pos+Pret: ikweimiban
     ikwe+Pos+VocPl: ikweim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     ikwe+Pos+Obv: ikweiman
     ikwe+Pos+Pl: ikweimag
     ikwe+Pos+Loc: ikweiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikweishinaan
     ikwe+Pej+PosPl: ikweishiwaa
     ikwe+Pej+PosObv: ikweishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     ikwe+Pej+Pret: ikweishiban
     ikwe+Pej+VocPl: ikweish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     ikwe+Pej+Obv: ikweishan
     ikwe+Pej+Pl: ikweishag
     ikwe+Pej+Loc: ikweishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweinaaniban
     ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+PosPl+Pret: ikweiwaaiban
     ikwe+PosPl+VocPl: ikweiwaa***idig, idog***
     ikwe+PosObv+Pret: ikweiniiban
     ikwe+PosObv+VocPl: ikweini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     ikwe+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweinaanan
     ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweinaanag
     ikwe+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweinaaning
     ikwe+PosPl+Obv: ikweiwaaan
     ikwe+PosPl+Pl: ikweiwaaag
     ikwe+PosPl+Loc: ikweiwaaing
     ikwe+PosObv+Obv: ikweinian
     ikwe+PosObv+Pl: ikweiniag
     ikwe+PosObv+Loc: ikweiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     ikwe+Pret+Obv: ikweibanan
     ikwe+Pret+Pl: ikweibanag
     ikwe+Pret+Loc: ikweibaning
     ikwe+VocPl+Obv: ikwe***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+VocPl+Pl: ikwe***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+VocPl+Loc: ikwe***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos: niikweensim
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos: niikweenhim
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos: giikweensim
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos: giikweenhim
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos: oikweensim
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos: oikweenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pej: niikweensish
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pej: niikweenhish
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pej: giikweensish
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pej: giikweenhish
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pej: oikweensish
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pej: oikweenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl: niikweensinaan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+PosPl: niikweensiwaa
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+PosObv: niikweensini
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl: niikweenhinaan
     +Px1ikwe+Con+PosPl: niikweenhiwaa
     +Px1ikwe+Con+PosObv: niikweenhini
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl: giikweensinaan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+PosPl: giikweensiwaa
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+PosObv: giikweensini
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl: giikweenhinaan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+PosPl: giikweenhiwaa
     +Px2ikwe+Con+PosObv: giikweenhini
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl: oikweensinaan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+PosPl: oikweensiwaa
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+PosObv: oikweensini
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl: oikweenhinaan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+PosPl: oikweenhiwaa
     +Px3ikwe+Con+PosObv: oikweenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pret: niikweensiban
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+VocPl: niikweens***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pret: niikweenhiban
     +Px1ikwe+Con+VocPl: niikweenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pret: giikweensiban
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+VocPl: giikweens***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pret: giikweenhiban
     +Px2ikwe+Con+VocPl: giikweenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pret: oikweensiban
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+VocPl: oikweens***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pret: oikweenhiban
     +Px3ikwe+Con+VocPl: oikweenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Obv: niikweensan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pl: niikweensag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Loc: niikweensing
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Obv: niikweenhan
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pl: niikweenhag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Loc: niikweenhing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Obv: giikweensan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pl: giikweensag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Loc: giikweensing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Obv: giikweenhan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pl: giikweenhag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Loc: giikweenhing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Obv: oikweensan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pl: oikweensag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Loc: oikweensing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Obv: oikweenhan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pl: oikweenhag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Loc: oikweenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Pej: niikweimish
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Pej: giikweimish
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej: oikweimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Pos1Pl: niikweiminaan
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+PosPl: niikweimiwaa
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+PosObv: niikweimini
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Pos1Pl: giikweiminaan
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+PosPl: giikweimiwaa
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+PosObv: giikweimini
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pos1Pl: oikweiminaan
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+PosPl: oikweimiwaa
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+PosObv: oikweimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Pret: niikweimiban
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+VocPl: niikweim***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Pret: giikweimiban
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+VocPl: giikweim***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pret: oikweimiban
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+VocPl: oikweim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Obv: niikweiman
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Pl: niikweimag
     +Px1ikwe+Pos+Loc: niikweiming
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Obv: giikweiman
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Pl: giikweimag
     +Px2ikwe+Pos+Loc: giikweiming
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Obv: oikweiman
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pl: oikweimag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Loc: oikweiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl: niikweishinaan
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+PosPl: niikweishiwaa
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+PosObv: niikweishini
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl: giikweishinaan
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosPl: giikweishiwaa
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+PosObv: giikweishini
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pos1Pl: oikweishinaan
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosPl: oikweishiwaa
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+PosObv: oikweishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+Pret: niikweishiban
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+VocPl: niikweish***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pret: giikweishiban
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+VocPl: giikweish***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pret: oikweishiban
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+VocPl: oikweish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+Obv: niikweishan
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+Pl: niikweishag
     +Px1ikwe+Pej+Loc: niikweishing
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Obv: giikweishan
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Pl: giikweishag
     +Px2ikwe+Pej+Loc: giikweishing
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Obv: oikweishan
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Pl: oikweishag
     +Px3ikwe+Pej+Loc: oikweishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret: niikweinaaniban
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niikweinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Pret: niikweiwaaiban
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+VocPl: niikweiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Pret: niikweiniiban
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+VocPl: niikweini***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret: giikweinaaniban
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giikweinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Pret: giikweiwaaiban
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+VocPl: giikweiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Pret: giikweiniiban
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+VocPl: giikweini***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret: oikweinaaniban
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oikweinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Pret: oikweiwaaiban
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+VocPl: oikweiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Pret: oikweiniiban
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+VocPl: oikweini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Obv: niikweinaanan
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pl: niikweinaanag
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Loc: niikweinaaning
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Obv: niikweiwaaan
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Pl: niikweiwaaag
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Loc: niikweiwaaing
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Obv: niikweinian
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Pl: niikweiniag
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Loc: niikweiniing
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Obv: giikweinaanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pl: giikweinaanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Loc: giikweinaaning
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Obv: giikweiwaaan
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Pl: giikweiwaaag
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Loc: giikweiwaaing
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Obv: giikweinian
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Pl: giikweiniag
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Loc: giikweiniing
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Obv: oikweinaanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pl: oikweinaanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Loc: oikweinaaning
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Obv: oikweiwaaan
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Pl: oikweiwaaag
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Loc: oikweiwaaing
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Obv: oikweinian
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Pl: oikweiniag
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Loc: oikweiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Pret+Obv: niikweibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Pret+Pl: niikweibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Pret+Loc: niikweibaning
     +Px1ikwe+VocPl+Obv: niikwe***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+VocPl+Pl: niikwe***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+VocPl+Loc: niikwe***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Pret+Obv: giikweibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pret+Pl: giikweibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pret+Loc: giikweibaning
     +Px2ikwe+VocPl+Obv: giikwe***idig, idog***an
